Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-520
Rural fire protection district; false alarm; false report; violation; penalty.

Whoever willfully or maliciously shall raise a false alarm or false report of a fire in any rural fire protection district or any rural area within the State of Nebraska shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1963, c. 193, § 1, p. 638;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 170.